Massachusetts, session 194th, S1964.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 38D of Chapter 59 is hereby amended by deleting the section and replacing it
with the following:
Section 38D. A board of assessors may request the owner or lessee of any real property to
make a written return under oath within sixty days containing such information as may
reasonably be required by it to determine the actual fair cash valuation of such property.
Failure of an owner or lessee of real property to comply with such request within 60 days
after it has been made by the board of assessors shall be automatic grounds for dismissal of a
filing at the appellate tax board. The appellate tax board and the county commissioners shall not
grant extensions for the purposes of extending the filing requirements unless the applicant was
of 2

unable to comply with such request for reasons beyond his control or unless he attempted to
comply in good faith. If any owner or lessee of real property in a return made under this section
makes any statement which he knows to be false in a material particular, such false statement
shall bar him from any statutory appeal under this chapter.
If an owner or lessee of Class one, residential property fails to submit the information
within the time and in the form prescribed, the owner shall be assessed an additional penalty for
the next ensuing tax year in the amount of $50 for single family dwellings and $250 for all other
residential real estate, but only if the board of assessors informed the owner or lessee that failure
to submit such information would result in the penalty.
If an owner or lessee of Class three, commercial or Class four, industrial property fails to
submit the information within the time and in the form prescribed, the owner or lessee shall be
assessed an additional penalty for the next ensuing tax year in the amount of $250 but only if the
board of assessors informed the owner or lessee that failure to so submit such information would
result in the penalty.
of 2